test/src/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - tjáppisgiedjek: # GAHPER
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Nom: [tjáhppisgiedjek, tjáhppis-giedjek]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Gen: [tjáhppisgiedjega, tjáhppis-giedjega]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Acc: [tjáhppisgiedjegav, tjáhppis-giedjegav]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Ine: [tjáhppisgiedjegin, tjáhppis-giedjegin]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Ill: [tjáhppisgiedjegij, tjáhppis-giedjegij]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Ela: [tjáhppisgiedjegis, tjáhppis-giedjegis]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Sg+Com: [tjáhppisgiedjegijn, tjáhppis-giedjegijn]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Nom: [tjáhppisgiedjega, tjáhppis-giedjega]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Gen: [tjáhppisgiedjegij, tjáhppis-giedjegij]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Acc: [tjáhppisgiedjegijt, tjáhppis-giedjegijt]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Ine: [tjáhppisgiedjegijn, tjáhppis-giedjegijn]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Ill: [tjáhppisgiedjegijda, tjáhppis-giedjegijda]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Ela: [tjáhppisgiedjegijs, tjáhppis-giedjegijs]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Pl+Com: [tjáhppisgiedjegij, tjáhppis-giedjegij]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Ess: [tjáhppisgiedjegin, tjáhppis-giedjegin]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [tjáhppisgiedjegasj, tjáhppis-giedjegasj]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [tjáhppisgiedjegattjasj, tjáhppis-giedjegattjasj]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/dibme+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/ahtes+A+Sg+Nom: [tjáhppisgiedjegahtes, tjáhppis-giedjegahtes]
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    tjáhppat+A+Attr+Cmp#giedjek+N+Abe: [tjáhppisgiedjegahtá, tjáhppis-giedjegahtá, tjáhppisgiedjegahti, tjáhppis-giedjegahti]

  Noun - tjehpudakmihtto : # MUORRA
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Nom: [tjehpudakmihtto, tjehpudak-mihtto, tjehpudahkamihtto, tjehpudahka-mihtto]
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Ine: [tjehpudakmihton, tjehpudak-mihton, tjehpudahkamihton, tjehpudahka-mihton]
    tjehpudahka+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#mihtto+N+Sg+Ill: [tjehpudakmihttuj, tjehpudak-mihttuj, tjehpudahkamihttuj, tjehpudahka-mihttuj]

  Noun - viedtjamulmusj : #
    viedtjat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#ulmusj+N+Sg+Nom: [viedtjamulmusj, viedtjam-ulmusj] 
    viedtjat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#ulmusj+N+Sg+Ine: [viedtjamulmutjin, viedtjam-ulmutjin]
    viedtjat+V+TV+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#ulmusj+N+Sg+Ill: [viedtjamulmutjij, viedtjam-ulmutjij]

  Noun - uksagiehtje : # MUORRA
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Nom: [uksagiehtje, uksa-giehtje]
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ine: [uksagietjen, uksa-gietjen]
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ill: [uksagæhtjáj, uksa-gæhtjáj, uksagähtjáj, uksa-gähtjáj]

  Noun - uvsagiehtje : # MUORRA
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Nom: [uvsagiehtje, uvsa-giehtje]
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ine: [uvsagietjen, uvsa-gietjen]
    uksa+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ill: [uvsagæhtjáj, uvsa-gæhtjáj, uvsagähtjáj, uvsa-gähtjáj]

  Noun - uvsajgiehtje : # MUORRA
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Nom: [uvsajgiehtje, uvsaj-giehtje]
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ine: [uvsajgietjen, uvsaj-gietjen]
    uksa+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#giehtje+N+Sg+Ill: [uvsajgæhtjáj, uvsaj-gæhtjáj, uvsajgähtjáj, uvsaj-gähtjáj]

  Noun - nijbbedille : # MUORRA
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: [nijbbedille, nijbbe-dille]
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: [nijbbedilen, nijbbe-dilen]
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: [nijbbedilláj, nijbbe-dilláj]

  Noun - nijbedille : # MUORRA
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: [nijbedille, nijbe-dille]
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: [nijbedilen, nijbe-dilen]
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: [nijbedilláj, nijbe-dilláj]

  Noun - nijbbedille : # MUORRA
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: [nijbijdille, nijbij-dille]
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: [nijbijdilen, nijbijdilen]
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: [nijbijdilláj, nijbij-dilláj]

  Noun - nijbbedille : # MUORRA
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Nom: [nijbijdille, nijbij-dille]
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ine: [nijbijdilen, nijbij-dilen]
    nijbbe+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dille+N+Sg+Ill: [nijbijdilláj, nijbij-dilláj]
